Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4152.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 1531e. (1) In addition to the requirements under sections
1538a and 1531i, as applicable, and subject to subsection (2), the
department shall not, beginning September 30, 2027, approve a
teacher preparation program or an alternative teaching program and
shall revoke, by September 30, 2027, shall revoke the approval of a
teacher preparation program or an alternative teaching program
unless the teacher preparation program or alternative teaching
program offers instruction regarding all of the following:
(a) The characteristics of dyslexia and underlying factors
CRM H00112'25 (H-2) fjm7cb


that place pupils at risk for difficulties in learning to decode
accurately and efficiently.
(b) The secondary consequences of dyslexia, such as problems
in reading comprehension and a reduced reading experience that can
impede the growth of vocabulary and background knowledge and that
can lead to social, emotional, and behavioral difficulties.
(c) Instructional adjustments for pupils with dyslexia and
instructional adjustments for addressing underlying factors that
place pupils at risk for difficulties in learning to decode
accurately and efficiently.
(d) Methods for developing schoolwide and classroom
infrastructure that meet the collective and individual needs of
pupils using a multi-tiered system of support (MTSS).
(e) For a teacher preparation program or an alternative
teaching program that prepares individuals for certification
certifications or endorsements that involve reading instruction,
language arts, or special education, as appropriate, or for school
psychologist licensure, in addition to the requirements in
subdivisions (a) to (d), both of the following:
(i) Evidence-based instructional methods and features of
evidence-based interventions that are grounded in the science of
reading and principles of structured literacy that are designed for
pupils with characteristics of dyslexia and pupils at risk for
difficulties in learning to decode accurately and efficiently.
(ii) Evidence-based instructional methods and features of
evidence-based interventions that are grounded in the science of
reading and principles of structured literacy that are designed to
effectively meet the needs of most pupils.
(2) If a teacher preparation program or alternative teaching
CRM H00112'25 (H-2) fjm7cb


program does not prepare individuals for certification
certifications or endorsements that involve reading instruction,
language arts, or special education, or for school psychologist
licensure, the department may issue a waiver for 1 or more of the
requirements in subsection (1)(a) to (d). A waiver issued by the
department under this subsection must be reviewed at least every 2
years to ensure the waiver is still appropriate and aligned with
the department's goals for teacher preparation.
(3) Beginning September 30, 2027, if a teacher preparation
program or alternative teaching program prepares individuals for
certifications or endorsements that involve the teaching of
mathematics content, the department shall not approve the teacher
preparation program or alternative teaching program and, by
September 30, 2027, shall revoke the approval of a teacher
preparation program or alternative teaching program unless the
mathematics curriculum offered by the teacher preparation program
or alternative teaching program was developed in consultation with
a professor who specializes in mathematics. For any teacher
preparation program or alternative teaching program that does not
teach content, this subsection does not apply.
(4) Beginning September 30, 2027, if a teacher preparation
program or alternative teaching program prepares individuals for
certifications or endorsements that involve the teaching of science
content, the department shall not approve the teacher preparation
program or alternative teaching program and, by September 30, 2027,
shall revoke the approval of a teacher preparation program or
alternative teaching program unless the science curriculum offered
by the teacher preparation program or alternative teaching program
was developed in consultation with a professor who specializes in
CRM H00112'25 (H-2) fjm7cb


science. For any teacher preparation program or alternative
teaching program that does not teach content, this subsection does
not apply.
(5) (3) As used in this section, "dyslexia", "evidence-based",
"multi-tiered system of support (MTSS)", "science of reading", and
"structured literacy" mean those terms as defined in section 1280f.
Final Page
CRM H00112'25 (H-2) fjm7cb